Washington statutes.
RCW 41.37.120

False statements—Penalty.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statements, or falsifies or permits to be falsified any record or records of this retirement system in any attempt to defraud the retirement system as a result of such an act, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2004 c 242 s 15.]